Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.175

Copies of certain filed documents to insurance commissioner.

The secretary of state shall deliver to the office of the insurance commissioner copies of corporate documents filed with the secretary of state by health care service contractors and health maintenance organizations that have been provided for the insurance commissioner under RCW 48.44.013 and 48.46.012.

[ 1998 c 23 s 18.]